test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-INTR-IPFV-0i-nagudiitlod_jump-down_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Verb - nàgudiitłod[jump-down] :
    nàgudiitłod[jump-down]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjSg1:       nàgudistłod
    nàgudiitłod[jump-down]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjSg2:       nàgudíítłod
    nàgudiitłod[jump-down]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjSg3:       nàgudiitłod
    nàgudiitłod[jump-down]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjPl1:       [nàgudiìtłod, nàgudaàtłod]
    nàgudiitłod[jump-down]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjPl1+Distr: [nàdàgudiìtłod, nàdàgudaàtłod]
    nàgudiitłod[jump-down]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjPl2:       nàgudastłod
    nàgudiitłod[jump-down]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjPl2+Distr: nàdàgudastłod
    nàgudiitłod[jump-down]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjPl3:       nàgugidiitłod
    nàgudiitłod[jump-down]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjPl3+Distr: nàdàgugidiitłod
    nàgudiitłod[jump-down]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjSg4:       nàguts'idiitłod
    nàgudiitłod[jump-down]+V+I+Ipfv+SbjSg4+Distr: nàdàguts'idiitłod
